Utah statutes.
62A-15-636.   Periodic review -- Discharge.

Each local mental health authority or its designee shall, as frequently as practicable, examine or cause to be examined every person who has been committed to it.  Whenever the local mental health authority or its designee determines that the conditions justifying involuntary commitment no longer exist, it shall discharge the patient.  If the patient has been committed through judicial proceedings, a report describing that determination shall be sent to the clerk of the court where the proceedings were held.

